Utah statutes.
41-3-404.   Right of action against dealer, salesperson, crusher, body shop,
or surety on bond.
(1)  A person may maintain an action against a dealer, crusher, or body shop
on the corporate surety bond if:
(a)  the person suffers a loss or damage because of:
(i)  fraud;
(ii)  fraudulent representation; or
(iii)  a violation of Section 41-3-210; and
(b)  the loss or damage results from the action of:
(i)  a licensed dealer;
(ii)  a licensed dealer's salesperson acting on behalf of the dealer or within
the scope of the salesperson's employment;
(iii)  a licensed crusher; or
(iv)  a body shop.
(2)  Successive recovery against a surety on a bond is permitted, but the
total aggregate liability on the bond to all persons making claims, regardless
of the number of claimants or the number of years a bond remains in force, may
not exceed the amount of the bond.
(3)  A cause of action may not be maintained against any surety under any bond
required under this chapter except as provided in Section 41-3-205.
